Hawaii statutes.
§454F-9 Continuing education; mortgage loan
originators. (a) Each year, a licensed mortgage loan originator shall
complete at least eight hours of education approved in accordance with
subsection (b) that shall include:

(1) Three hours of federal law and regulations;

(2) One hour of the State's law and rules;

(3) Two hours of ethics that shall include
instruction on fraud, consumer protection, and fair lending issues; and

(4) Two hours of training related to lending
standards for the nontraditional mortgage product marketplace.

(b) For purposes of subsection (a), continuing
education courses shall be reviewed and approved by NMLS based upon reasonable
standards. Review and approval of a continuing education course shall include
review and approval of the course provider.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the
use of any education course that is approved by NMLS and provided by the
employer of the mortgage loan originator, an entity that is affiliated with the
mortgage loan originator by an agency contract, or any subsidiary or affiliate
of the employer or entity.

(d) Continuing education may be offered either
in a classroom, online, or by any other means approved by NMLS.

(e) A licensed mortgage loan originator:

(1) May only receive credit for a continuing
education course in the year in which the course is taken, except for
continuing education credits received pursuant to this chapter; and

(2) May not take the same approved course in the same
or successive years to meet the annual requirements for continuing education;
provided that the term "successive years" shall mean the two years
following the year in which a mortgage loan originator takes an approved
course.

(f) A licensed mortgage loan originator who is
an approved instructor of an approved continuing education course may receive
continuing education credit for the course taught at the rate of two hours
credit for every one hour taught.

(g) Continuing education courses as described
in subsection (a) and approved by NMLS for any state, that are successfully
completed by a licensed mortgage loan originator, shall be accepted as credit
towards completion of continuing education requirements in this State.

(h) A licensed mortgage loan originator who
subsequently becomes unlicensed shall complete the continuing education
requirements for the last year in which the license was held prior to issuance
of a new or renewed license.

(i) The license of a licensee meeting the
requirements of section 454F-8(a)(1) and (3) shall expire if the licensee fails
to meet the minimum requirements for continuing education. Reinstatement of
the expired license shall be allowed as provided for in section 454F-8.5. [L Sp
2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §16; am L 2011, c 194, §9; am L 2013, c
168, §§11, 20; am L 2016, c 122, §12]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next